Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WORKING GROUP ON ENDING LAND DISPOSAL OF MIXED MUNICIPAL SOLID WASTE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must establish a working group on ending the practice of land disposal of mixed municipal solid waste in the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The working group consists of the following 21 members, who must be appointed no later than October 1, 2026: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner or the commissioner's designee; new text end new text begin (2) one member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house; new text end new text begin (3) one member of the senate appointed by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (4) six elected county officials appointed by the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (5) two representatives of the solid waste industry appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (6) two representatives of environmental groups appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (7) two representatives of business interests appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (8) three members of the public appointed by the senate majority leader; and new text end new text begin (9) three members of the public appointed by the speaker of the house. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Compensation. new text end new text begin The compensation of working group members for each day spent on working group activities, when authorized by the working group, is the same as compensation provided for other members of boards and commissions under Minnesota Statutes, section 15.0575, subdivision 3, plus expenses in the same manner and amount as provided in the commissioner's plan adopted under Minnesota Statutes, section 43A.18, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties; report. new text end new text begin The working group must study steps that can be taken to end the practice of land disposal of mixed municipal solid waste and must report its findings and recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources by January 1, 2029. The report and recommendations must: new text end new text begin (1) identify steps that, if implemented in 2029, would eliminate the practice of landfilling in the state by 2040; new text end new text begin (2) assess the monetary and other costs of implementing each step identified, including how each step is likely to affect state and local governments, businesses and industry, and households and members of the public; and new text end new text begin (3) assess the long-term cost savings that are likely to be realized if each step is implemented. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Open meetings. new text end new text begin Working group meetings are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The working group expires upon submission of the report and recommendations required by subdivision 4. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WORKING GROUP ON ENDING LAND DISPOSAL OF MIXED MUNICIPAL SOLID WASTE IN MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for the expenses of the working group established in section 1. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end